Hawaii statutes.
[§239-6.5] Tax credit for lifeline
telephone service subsidy. A telephone public utility subject to this
chapter that has been authorized to establish lifeline telephone service rates
by the public utilities commission shall be allowed a tax credit, equal to the
lifeline telephone service costs incurred by the utility, to be applied against
the utility's tax imposed by this chapter. The amount of this credit shall be
determined and certified annually by the public utilities commission. The tax
liability for a telephone public utility claiming the credit shall be
calculated in the manner prescribed in section 239-5; provided that the amount
of tax due from the utility shall be net of the lifeline service credit. [L
1986, c 116, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next